Countering Election Subversion - Session 1: Misuse of the Legal System - April 19 
VIEW RECORDING - 120 mins (No highlights)


@0:00 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
you oily based a d date from each of you. you throughout the conversation today. Let me start by introducing myself.
My name is Beth Novak. I'm the director of the Burn Center for Social Change at Northeastern University and its partner project, the Governance Lab.
And I'm joined by a number of my colleagues here today. Dane, many of you who are heard from by email and Valeria, all of whom are available to you if you have any technical difficulties.
Let me get that right off the bat. So if there's anybody having any trouble with your audio or your video or have any trouble with Zoom, please by all means, drop us a line and we will also make available in the chat, the phone numbers.
So for some reason your internet goes out and you need to dial in. We want to make sure you have your phone, the phone numbers available to you today to help get us to keep you connected to the conversation.
Dane, do you want to give us any other logistical announcements before we dive into the substance?

@2:02 - Dane Gambrell (thegovlab.org)
Yes, so I'll just, I'll mention that we're going to record the conversation today to help with note-taking. So we'll record and we're also going to transcribe using an auto transcription tool.
Like Beth mentioned, it's helpful if you can rename yourself as you're joining. So if you can rename yourself to use your full name, your organization, and your pronouns if you'd like to include them.
And I think that's it for me, Beth.

@2:34 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Fantastic. So I'm going to follow your own instructions and recording in progress. And again, the note-taking is the transcription and the recording is for accessibility purposes.
First of all, so if you have any audio issues, you can, I believe, follow along with the transcription.

@2:53 - Dane Gambrell (thegovlab.org)
Is that right in this case, Dane? Yes, so you'll see a button called captions at the bottom of the screen that you can.

@3:00 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
can click if you want to enable captions. Okay, I believe that might be under the more button. At least it is on my small screen here.
So under the three dots and more you'll find captions if you need the transcription during the conversation. Otherwise we use it simply for note-taking purposes during the conversation.
So welcome to this important discussion. We are have been at the GovLab for a long time. In fact, long before COVID and long before Zoom was even a thing.
I have been pulling together large groups of people to try with the benefit of technology to organize deliberative dialogues about important conversations, important topics, in an effort to tap the intelligence and expertise of the smartest people with the best and most practical ideas for how we can solve our hardest problems in the world.
So we are an organization that's very committed to uses of technology to deepen and promote democracy. So what we do is help to develop methods and improve.
apply the use of tools to help us have more open and participatory conversations about hard problems. And that's what we're here to do today.
And therefore want to make very clear, you are here because of your significant knowhow. And therefore we want to hear from you.
I know there's a lot of people on this Zoom, but please, please, please do not be shy. We want to hear from you whether it's out loud as we hope or also in the chat.
So that's the one other housekeeping announcement that I want to make. And some of you, if you've joined us for these kinds of conversations before, have heard me say that we think about this as a conversation in three dimensions or in four dimensions.
It's happening out loud. It's happening in the chat. We will use both the R team and also, thankfully, AI now to help us organize that conversation into a coherent set of notes that we will then share back with you so that everybody benefits from the insights that are shared today.
So please don't hesitate to talk. and type at the same time. Also with so many people, it becomes difficult sometimes online to have, if you have something to say and someone else is, you know, it's related to a topic that was said through three minutes ago, we will organize it after the fact so that it's coherent.
That said, please, because we have a large group of people, do let us know if you want to speak.
You can use the reaction button at the bottom of your screen to raise your hand electronically, if you click on reaction, it will raise your hand.
You can do the same thing to lower your hand. You can also write to me or to dine in the chat and let us know back channel that you would like to be added to the queue and I will be regularly keeping the queue as we go forward in this conversation.
Okay, so let me dive in now substantively to say that we are here to have this conversation about elections aversion and election denial.
It is the first of three sessions. The first of which today is very specifically focused on misuse of the legal system and administrative systems to promote election subversion and denial.
The second session will be talking about the role of journalism in media. Both the role of journalism in helping to counter election denial, but also some of the things that journalists in the media may be doing wrong that are contributing to election denial.
And our third session will be focused on election related violence. So we know these topics are very intertwined and there are many more root causes of election subversion and denial.
But we're so we're going to do our best today to focus on this narrower topic of the role of misuse of the legal system in our conversation that we're going to have today and misuse of administrative systems.
You received a bunch of background materials. prior to this conversation. We're going to put them again in the chat now just so you can review them if you didn't have a chance to take a look previously.
There's a problem brief which essentially is a short background under on the conversation and we'll also repost in a list of who's here so that we don't spend time on long introductions now as well as further details about session logistics which includes the phone numbers that you need to dial in.
And with that what I'm going to do before we start our conversation is turn us over to Lindsey Daniels, Senior Director for Elections and Voting and Democracy Fund Voice and we would love to have her just say a word about how Democracy Fund Voice is thinking about this topic and also what we're hoping to hear from you as part of this conversation and then we'll come back to outline the topics for conversation and go from there.
Lindsey can I turn it over to you?

@8:00 - Lindsay Daniels
Good. Yeah, thank you, Beth. And more importantly, thanks to everyone in this room for being here. Certainly, there are a lot of hard problems in democracy right now, and really looking forward to this particular conversation.
So for those of you who don't know Democracy Fund or Democracy Fund and our mission is to really ensure that we have a US democracy that is resilient in the face of change and worthy of the American people's trust.
We support partners and ideas from across the political spectrum in pursuit of a vibrant and diverse public square, free and fair elections, effective and accountable government and adjusting inclusive society.
The project of This work today is a project of the Elections and Voting Program. And we have two core initiatives in that program, Voting Power and Resilient Elections.
This conversation is really to help inform this work around resilient elections, which is a somewhat new area of work for us, though it draws on a lot of work we've done over the past seven years as well.
And we're thinking about how do we strengthen the election infrastructure, so it's less vulnerable to election sabotage and election related violence.
So today we really are grateful to have your expertise in this conversation so we can cultivate innovative new strategies about how to work on the problems of sabotage and election denialism.
And we hope that this conversation produces concrete and specific ideas that will help us think about the best ways to achieve.
are new grant making strategy around Brazilian elections. As Beth mentioned, you have a problem brief. And this section focuses on the misuses of the administrative and legal systems that lead to elections aversion or election denialism, including the misuse of the courts, abuse of freedom of Information Act, and other records or quests, and misuse of other administrative processes.
So we've intentionally narrowed this conversation, but as Beth mentioned, this is just one of a larger project with a couple of additional sessions.
And we know that there's important work, and many of us are working on issues of access to voting, campaign finance reform, media misinformation, but that isn't what we'll focus on today, we'll keep this conversation around issues of frivolous litigation and misuse of public records requests.
We've seen a lot of that in the past. in the post 2020 election. And while we know that access to public records and the ability to use the legal system are important and fundamental rights, we're not interested in rolling back those rights, but rather we're trying to ensure that individuals and groups have the ability to meaningful exercise these rights under the law.
We've seen lots of examples, malicious lawsuits with the goal of overturning elections, records request to election offices that serve no positive purpose, except to burden and strain election offices.
And so we really wanna think about those issues and solutions today. We take a lot of both and approach here at Democracy and Fund Voice, and so we're interested in your ideas for resourcing both new projects or initiatives, but also for efforts that might already be underway.
We're interested in both. short and long-term solutions. We have a systems approach to this work. We are looking for a mix of short medium and long-term timelines.
We know we need interventions that might target the problem today, but also maybe some less direct that will improve conditions to produce change over time.
Finally, we're interested in both C3 and C4 ideas. So we have both C3 and C4 vehicles at Democracy Fund, Democracy Fund voice.
So we know that issues that might include solutions that might include lobbying or legislative action are also part of our portfolio.
So I once again just want to thank all of you for being here. Many of you who I've worked with before, who are current grantees, partners.
It's really wonderful to see you and really appreciate your time, many new faces. I haven't worked as cozy with also just very grateful that you're
here and with that I'll turn it back over to the GovLab team.

@13:06 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Whoops, wonderful. Thank you very much. Let me just ask if there are any clarifying questions for you or follow-up questions.
First, if there's anything that's at any point unclear, so what I would call in real space, a two-finger intervention, please let us know at any point if you have an immediate or urgent question or a follow-on point from what someone else has said, I would invite people now though if they have any follow-on questions for you to put them in the chat, I think, so that we can move forward and start to bring in the significant expertise from this group.
With that said, since we have a large group of people and we would like to hear from everybody, please do try to keep your interventions brief, but please do intervene.
We very much want to hear from you and to that end you'll allow me moderator's privilege to, as polite
as I can to keep things moving forward on time. So preemptively and preventively, let me please apologize for any events I may cause at asking you to be brief or cutting you up mid-sentence.
Let me put in the chat right now what the way we're gonna organize our conversation this is in the problem brief, so hopefully no surprise.
But sort of the three questions, sorry for the big block of text, that we're gonna use to organize our conversation.
So I really wanna start to tee up people who would like to speak on the first topic with regard to preventing or decreasing incentives to advance for those who are filing and advancing meritless or malicious litigation.
Again, very conscious of the fact that any suggestions here have to preserve the right of people there, the fundamental right to be able to file litigation.
And to remind you to please be as concrete and as specific as possible. We have unusually for many companies
conversations a real goal here, which is to help guide democracy fund and democracy fund voice and their funding decisions.
And to if I may put it so bluntly, to help influence where you write these checks. So please be concrete and specific is our goal here.
And with that, let me try to move forward the conversation and see who would like to go first. And I'm going to, I was a law professor in a past life.
So I'm gonna, Michael, Teeter first on tap, followed by Brian, and I'll take other names for the queue while we go over to Michael.

@15:43 - Michael Teter (he/him) -- The 65 Project
Thanks. It's great to be here. Thank you, everyone. So I run and manage the 65 project, which is a accountability project that launched in March of 2022, that's focused on holding the lawyers who filed the lawsuits against, or in the wake of the
2020 election accountable for their their filing. So today we filed a little over 70. I think we're at 73 bar complaints across the country focusing on on those lawyers as well as those who were advising President Trump and others behind the scenes who the January 6 committee has focused on I think that the bar system our experience have shown that the bar associations and the state judiciary's are not we're not equipped and probably still are not equipped to handle a kind of unprecedented abuse and strategic abuse of the legal system the way that we saw after the 2020 election.
And so one of the things that we need to I think focus on is how we can get the structures around professional responsibility engaged in a way that allows them to move more quickly and demonstrate more adequately that there will be consequences for lawyers who are engaging in this abuse and who are filing both actually and legally meritless claims, which I think is the defining key.
of these lawsuits that allow, still allow lawyers who have a factual basis or legal basis for bringing their claims to still have that process available to them that will not allow lawyers to undermine democracy in the way that the lawyers following the 2020 election did.
So I think that's the starting point. I'll try to keep it that brief.

@17:24 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. I'm going to go over now to Brian and then just a reminder that if you have a follow up for anybody who's spoken, please add it to the chat.
And also feel free to share links with one another etc.

@17:38 - Brian Baird
So Brian over to you and then I have to reset and Veronica. Thank you and thanks to Democracy Fund and to everyone here.
My background real briefly is that I served 12 years from the Congress and as Beth knows have worked a fair bit on election security issues and I'll just raise three categories of points.
The first is, I hope at some point we'll seriously look at the at the motives. why people are doing this, why is this an issue?
And I wanna begin, be brief, but there's external factors. There are external actors, both partisan and media, et cetera.
What are the sources of the disruptions? What is their motive? And I think really important I'm motive, because all of us, I assume, are here because we want elections to be fair, accessible, and accurate, but there are other people who want elections to just go their way and win for the sake of power.
And if we don't understand that motive, it's not frivolous lawsuits. It's very purposeful, very intentant, and trying to undermine the faith and the democracy itself so they can gain power by that undermining.
We also need to look at the internal factors why voters are receptive to this, and psychology psychological factors like cognitive bias, false consensus.
People think the election was stolen because everybody agrees with them, and if it doesn't go their way, it must have been stolen.
So we have to look at those factors as well. Secondly, I think we also need to acknowledge that the current mechanisms that we use to validate or invalidate who is a voter are woefully inadequate.
The signature process in mail-in ballots, for example, is easy to fake a signature and it's easy to reject a signature that is legitimate.
So it's flawed in two ways. And if we don't address that, I think we're going to be vulnerable to litigation because and also to people manipulating the outcome.
The third factor is this, and it's not exactly germane to this, but it could one day be incredibly germane.
We do not have a from point of deposit, the ballot to the point of which it's counted, reliable way of tracking it.
And the easiest way to disrupt election now is with a pint of gasoline and a match, and you just throw it into a ballot box in an area where you don't like the way those people are going to vote, and you can destroy thousands of ballots in an hour.
And with minimal consequence, probably get away with it. And the legal ramifications, what happens if we do that are completely unsolved.
So we need to anticipate other potential events that could lead to complex legal situations down the road. And with that, I'll stop.
Thank you.

@20:15 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Great. I'm going to pass the mic now to Teresa.

@20:20 - M. Teresa Mabry
Thank you. Good morning, Y'all. Teresa, any pronouns to do with me? One of the co-executive directors with the Arizona Democracy Resource Center.
I want to also give some context. I know that we had some of the reading that Y'all had before.
I think some of the framing is a little bit, it's missing our community. And so when we frame it, okay, how is our government working?
How does the Democracy actually serve our folks? We have to center our people in the framing. And so when we're thinking tangibly around what does it look like to intervene, these things are happening intentionally.
We know that certain things function a certain way. Folks are talking about making sure that results are moving quickly, particularly in the state of Arizona.
We know their Secretary of State who the former county recorder for Maricopa County is saying and making deals and now is an election denier, a Democrat election denier, saying that if he had this money that he could then move elections in a more efficient way, but pushing forward a bill that would move or expedite results that would share Arizona's information.
And so making sure that these aren't intentionally how are we thinking about the expansion of the courts, what does it look like to invest in movement lawyering and a framework and so something that's worked for us is broad coalition building and making sure that when national partners are with us and moving with us, like we work with AVL to do a democracy defense after our election protection program because we didn't know what was going to happen in regards to legal interventions but also what mobilization needed to happen.
And so making sure that our folks were able to move and have the lead resources prepped and ready to go in that response, but also just a coordination.
And so in regards to centering our folks in the conversation, making sure that we have the ability to do that and broader coalition and ask about our naming this missing disinformation and actually calling them live for what they are.

@22:18 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. I'm going to go over now to Veronica root.

@22:26 - Veronica Root Martinez
Hi, my name is Veronica Martinez. I'm a professor at Duke University School of Law, and I teach a variety of legal ethics courses.
I wanted to be responsive to the first question about what sort of what can be done to prevent and decrease incentives for lawyers and other information.

@22:57 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Did we lose her or is it me.

@23:00 - Dane Gambrell (thegovlab.org)
I think we lost her.

@23:02 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Okay. So I'll tell you what, we're going to bring her back when she comes back. And what I'll do is let me go over next to Katie Anthony.
I had some more people. I'm going to add to the queue. But I also want to point out there have been two questions asked in the chat.
So earlier on, we have a question from Marilyn. If you want to scroll up and we have a question from Cindy.
So I want to encourage people, please to continue the conversation there in parallel. So let me go over to Katie to you next.

@23:32 - Katie Anthony (she/her), American Oversight
Thanks, everyone. I'm Katie Anthony. I'm at American oversight. We deal in public records work. And just in response to the first question, we've had a couple comments about bark and plains and professional responsibility.
And I think another important thing to keep in mind is that we have, you know, litigation. Approaches we can take as well, like moving for sanctions or.
contempt that I think is an important thing to keep in mind. Speaking from my organization's experience, we were not so much dealing with frivolous lawsuits but frivolous defenses, everything that the opposing party could throw at us.
They were whether it was grounded in any kind of reality or not. And this was in a couple different cases we've had about trying to get records and transparency about the so-called election audits in both Wisconsin and Arizona.
And because we were able to devote the time and resources to really when we were faced with those malicious frivolous attempts to undermine our legitimate claims, we were able to put the time and resources into really responding aggressively, moving for contempt against the parties in some cases.
We also had a a judge who really just had it and he held actually removed pro-hoc admissions for some of the lawyers who had taken that tack.
But my point being just from a funding perspective, I think a lot of either government offices or nonprofits who are doing either the type of work I'm doing where we're defending against these sort of counterclaims and defenses were trying to deal with that.
But also when you're faced with these frivolous lawsuits just from the outset, you don't have the time and resources to necessarily take those additional steps of moving to sanctions, moving for contempt.
And I think just having some more infrastructure for the funding of those resources to really effectively respond to these litigation tactics in the lawsuit itself, and then taking those additional steps.
on the professional responsibility forefront with bar complaints as a separate prom sort of a dual prom approach.

@26:10 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Wonderful. Let's keep going through the queue. And again, reminders follow up conversation in the chat would be very helpful.
So, who do I have now? I think, am I up to Katie? Sorry, that was, Cindy, excuse me, sorry.

@26:33 - Cindy Cohn (she)
Hi, well, I just, I had put a question in the chat, which is, I think that I'm, I think I sit a little closer to where Katie is.
We do a lot of Freedom of Information Act work at the Electronic Frontier Foundation. And I will say that the lack of support and hostility from agencies, because they're, you know, they're not set up to do this.
The people who do the FOIA responses are often not the, it's not the reason they. joined. And so I think that making sure that we're not creating more obstacles for people who are seeking government stuff is really important.
And I know you've named that. And so I was, my question was actually for the people who are actually doing the post accountability for lawyers and stuff, what actual obstacles they're running into, because I completely agree that there needs to be more accountability for bad behavior by lawyers in court.
But if you build a process, you always have to think about how it will be misused. And I think it would be, we'd be remiss if we assumed that only good guys are going to use these accountability processes.

@27:41 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
And that bad guys won't, and that we need to make sure that they are robust to that. Yeah. Fantastic.
I think we have next in the queue. Oh, Veronica is the one we lost before, right? Are you back?

@27:56 - Veronica Root Martinez, Duke University School of Law
Can we hear you now? Can you hear me?

@27:58 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
We do hear you. So I'm going to to reorder things and put you back in line and if you want to finish what you started and then we'll restart from there.

@28:07 - Veronica Root Martinez, Duke University School of Law
Sorry I'm not exactly sure what Mike Peter did. So I teach professional responsibility. They also watch professional responsibility cases.
The state bars are where you should see the lawyer discipline happening and they always say that they're under-resourced. There's also a variety of issues within the state bars.
The best example is the state of a variety of state congressional reports done as well as state audits of the bar display system.
I suggest that there are a lot of failures within that system and so this is I think a long term intervention but there need to be policy recommendations about how state bars function, how the disciplinary proceeding function.
State bars also only regulate lawyers. They do not regulate law firms and in the financial brokerage space that's not true.
You regulate both the broker and the firm. That changes your funding source. changes your oversight ability, it changes your sanction ability as well.
And so I think that they're just going to be policy interventions. Additionally, I think on the judges point, I heard that the difficulty getting the station, I wonder whether or not there could be training for judges on what they're they can see a sponsor issue sanction.
Judges can issue referrals to state bars to tell them, hey, like I've had an attorney in my court, Dave engaged in the following conduct.
They need you need to open an investigatory system and so educating judges about those options. And then another long term intervention is actually within legal education specifically.
If you talk to lawyers and law professors, you might get told that doing research in the in the in the field of professional responsibility and ethics is disfavored and unlikely to get you hired at a law school.
And that the this curriculum is not to be invested in very heavily. There's only a few hospitals that I would say have a really robust profession.
professional ethics and responsibility curriculum. And I think we are seeing the end result of that. I don't think we need a new apparatus in order to regulate lawyers to engage in misconduct.
We need to better educate lawyers about their current responsibilities and sanction them when they don't adhere to them. We already, it's already there that we're not educating lawyers appropriately and we're not sanctioning them when they don't meet their professional standards.

@30:24 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
And thank you so much. Thank you very much. And thank you that was, as someone who has trained as a lawyer and went to law school, and the only thing I ever learned in professional responsibility was to call the client.
I can really just second that your intervention. Going over now to Suzanne Petroski at Rutgers.

@30:45 - Suzanne Piotrowski
Hi, Suzanne Petroski. I'm Rutgers in the School of Public Affairs and Administration, and I'm not a lawyer. So I have, I think, a slightly different approach to the issues that everyone's been talking about.
And I'm also going to respond a little bit to the, document that was sent out earlier, because I thought some of those ideas were really pretty interesting.
I think Cindy was talking about maybe the records clerks, and I think those people, the records custodians, the clerks would be good folks to bring into the conversation since they're the ones who are actually filing, filling these requests, as well as archivists, because they know a lot about record schedules, which obviously is related a lot to the FOI type issues.
I really like the idea that was in the issue brief on the proactive release of information. I think there's a lot there.
I would also say you might want to consider sort of the proactive release of records request logs. So some governments do this, local government, state governments, that the logs as soon as requests are come in, they're put up there so you can track who is how these requests are.
going. What else was that going to add? Oh, the administrative appeals process. I think that's also a really interesting one to look at.
I'm in New Jersey. We have a government records council in New Jersey, which you would go that route in New Jersey as opposed to litigation.
And it has worked well in the past, but my understanding right now it really isn't working very well. There are five, supposed to be five members.
There are only four on it. I don't think there's it's actually there's a lot of term there through the appeals.
So I think that's something to look into and maybe we'll go longer term. You know, when a lot of these laws were passed, there was like a model F.O.I law that was sent around.
So maybe it's time for a new model F.O.I law to be developed, put out there for folks to reflect on.
So I'll leave it there.

@32:54 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. Thanks. Over to Harney now.

@32:59 - Hani Mirza
Thank you. As to the question about how we can prevent incentives for lawyers and other actors from an instant litigation, I think one thing we can do early on even before these lawsuits are broad is to really attack bad bills in the legislature and state legislature specifically that emboldened attorneys to file these kind of malicious claims.
We're dealing with this in Texas. We've seen a ton of election contest filed against races in Harris County and Harris County has been a real target because it's the most diverse county in the state.
And what the ledge is doing is they're trying to pass like legislators are trying to pass bills to make it easier for people to win those contests or bring those contests and have them prioritized.
We're seeing the same thing with audits, like they're trying to change the rules to make it easier to get information.
education and documents a lot sooner, like months, a couple of months after the election even, and then also for voter challenges.
And what we've seen is like, when these lawsuits are filed, you see a reaction in the ledge, when the those lawsuits don't work and the cycle just continues, and what ends up happening is the next time around these lawyers that are bringing these malicious lawsuits, it makes it easier for them to do that.
They kind of create a business around them. So I think targeting these bills and making sure they don't pass is a great way to decrease the incentive in the future with regard to these types of lawsuits.
And then also for the second question about how we can put election administrators. Another way to do it is to also realize that like when election administrators do try to push back against these groups,
They face a retaliation at the ledge. We're seeing that with regard to Harris County currently, there's like an attempt to take over the elections administration in Harris County.
And I think having support, making sure these bills and these actions don't pass in the ledge is a great way to embolden election administrators to continue to fight back.

@35:25 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Fantastic. So I want to just also put out a call for anyone else who wants to be added to the queue for this first topic about malicious litigation.
And then we'll all try to advance us to the second topic on our conversation. But first, I'm going to go over to Joyce.

@35:47 - Joyce Gist Lewis, Krevolin & Horst
Joyce Joyce. Hi, everybody. So I really appreciate this topic. And I'm glad that you all are looking into it.
My partner, Adam Sparks, and I actually wrote a law review article on this. That's it. back in 2021 because we're in Georgia and we were sort of at the epicenter of a lot of these types of lawsuits being filed and as the problem brief noted a lot of this was just like cut and paste.
Right cut and pasted from other suits that had already been rejected by other courts. I'm not going to you know reiterate the excellent observations.
I've already heard on this call about the fact that yes. We have mechanisms in place. We have the ability for courts to suic font a sanction people who bring what they know to be frivolous lawsuits.
I would add to that there and and also we have we have our state bar that has a responsibility to look into lawyers who are bringing lawsuits which ethically they should know that they are they are not going to be able to to
to prevail on, but they're bringing them for the express purpose sometimes of being of the political party being able to say, well, we're fighting this in the court.
We have a lawsuit pending. They are in essence borrowing the patina of legitimacy from the court by the fact that they have a lawsuit pending.
Even if that lawsuit is dismissed out of hand, it gives them something to talk about. That in and of itself is an abuse of the judicial process.
Every time a lawsuit gets filed, especially one that is seeking some sort of emergency relief, there is a lot of activity in the court.
There's a lot of activity on the side of those who are opposing what it's being sought, which in Georgia sometimes included asking the courts to throw out millions of people's votes.
One of the suggestions I wanted to make, and I think we touched on this a little bit in the Law Review article, is in addition to rule 11 type sanctions, in addition to the ability of the bars to.
to discipline lawyers who are not acting in good faith, not obliging by their ethical duties and responsibilities in terms of hander to the tribunal, in terms of their duties to the constitution of our country.
The judges themselves have an inherent ability to control what happens in their courts. I don't know how many of you have heard of the concept of pre-filing orders or the All Ritz Act.
Judges can, if they are faced with a serial litigant or a serial filer of frivolous or abusive litigation, they can enter an order proactively saying, anytime this party files something, there needs to be a review by a judge before it is actually documented.
get in and given credit as an actual lawsuit. Essentially, it's a pre-screening based upon the past conduct that they know that this particular litigant has engaged in.
Obviously, there are concerns there because someone could try to deploy that against folks who are on the side of trying to assist voting rights.
But given what we saw, given that we saw certain law firms and certain lawyers repeatedly filing complaints, seeking judicial intervention, which they already knew was going to fail because they had already failed in other courts that they had brought it in within the week or or month prior to them, again, asserting it.
That is something that we could potentially consider as well. And I hadn't seen that discussed yet or. or uploaded in the problem brief.
There are tools there. Unfortunately, that requires also some fortitude on the part of the judges. As our judicial system becomes increasingly politicized, there is peril for judges who want to control the influx of these frivolous filings, and they do not want to be perceived as being political or as taking sides in a partisan way when there might just be frivolous versus non-privulous, but it's going to be as the judge having a political agenda.
And I think that's a challenge. I'm not sure how we necessarily defeat that challenge, but I'm really interested to hear other people's thoughts on what we can do to support our judges as they try to control the influx of these types of cases.

@40:54 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Great. Thanks. Let's hopefully get some responses to you going in the chat. Next up I have Virginia Martin

@41:00 - Virginia Martin, Columbia Co NY
from our election commissioner of one of the prettiest places in the world, Columbia County, New York. Thank you so much.
Yeah, I was election commissioner for 11 years and for 10 years, our county voted on handmarked paper ballots, and they were optically scanned.
And then we did huge audits, hand count audits of those ballots. And it was very transparent. Anybody was welcome to come in and watch them.
And we, frankly, did not have a problem with voter confidence at all, nor did we ever have any lawsuits logged against us.
So what I would offer that should be done is that we should, as much as humanly possible, make all of our election functions transparent and demonstrably provide an airtight chain of custody.
This would increase confidence amongst the rest of the voting population, and it would diminish their inclination to be sympathetic to these bad actors, which they probably do.
don't understand or many of them don't understand, you know, don't really don't have a leg to stand on. Elections are not that easy to understand if you are the average person and you haven't been allowed in to see exactly how they can be counted if they are counted by hand.
Doing that would provide hard evidence that each election was counted properly, which would provide support for a legal defense and also for bar associations that want to, you know, chastise people who are not doing what they should be doing.
It can be used in the court of public opinion, which is really important, and it might target, it might discourage the bad actors from targeting those venues.
I can tell you that providing that kind of transparency is not that hard to do. We did it for 10 years, we hand counted hundreds of thousands of votes, it doesn't cost that much and it doesn't take that long, and we had really, really good research.
else in our county. The other thing that I would say is I really support having as much information as possible available on websites, you know, available to the public and, you know, it's going to free up the staffers who are having to respond to, you know, request for information that really is legally publicly accessible and also will make it clear when bad actors are requesting that information that they're acting badly and illigidimately.
Thank you very much.

@43:31 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Great. Now I'm going over to Scott Harshberger at Lawyers, Deputy Mayor, and Democracy.

@43:38 - Scott Harshbarger
Hi, my name is Scott Harshberger. In prior life, I was the Attorney General of Massachusetts and District Attorney in Massachusetts.
I taught professional responsibility at Boston University. I also ran for governor in Massachusetts and lost by 2% and stopped.
trying to figure out where those votes came from. I'm thinking of challenging that over time. But that aside, in the last few years, in addition to the work so many of you are doing that is so important, we and the lawyers defending American democracy took the view at our 50th Harvard Law School reunion.
That it was remarkable that lawyers had been so silent in terms of the obvious nonpartisan attack and assault on democracy and the core principles of the rule of law that initially President Trump had undertaken and his enablers had continued.
The obvious problem now years later is that to my mind there almost no law school maintenance except Erwin Scholensky.
There are no law firm leaders in any major law firms of the big law Who are in any way speaking out on this?
bar associations have been remarkably silent and partly in concern for economic and other reasons about this Many of my my peers as former attorneys general have able to speak on this I Met much as I love them and many are in law firms that obviously see economic impact of all of this and Partly because every aspect of this world is seen as partisan the minute you get into politics People talk about it being partisan and the way they defend not getting involved is because it is partisan All of it that is involved unless remembers that's a former that I was brief interlude is Head of common cause national John Gardner
reminded us that democracy is not a spectator sport. And we're in the middle of that. And so many of you are focusing correctly on the fact that we're underlight as a society.
We are engaged in a highly polarized exercise to decide what are the core principles. But in my view, the lawyers have failed dramatically.
And I look at law schools, I look at games of law schools, I look at the leaders of law firms, bar associations, and the disciplinary bodies, which are somehow being called to light, lawyers have failing to fulfill their oaths.
And I am baffled by how we get that reversed. I see no sense of shame. I see no sense of that somehow or other we, as lawyers, which are who are supposed to uphold the center and the institutions that are in any way seeing the right.
the challenge that is going on here. And in many cases are defending the challenge because sales advocacy within the bounds of the law is a key component of professional responsibility.
So my concern and I we will continue to focus on discipline for lawyers. We will continue to try to mobilize lawyers.
But I will simply tell you after five years of doing this and Mr. Teeter and others can speak to what their experience is.
But the reality is that the only people that we are getting to enlist are retired or retiring lawyers. We are we are not able to mobilize young lawyers in law firms.
No leaders in law firms are speaking out. And I'm very concerned about that. I don't know what the mechanism is by which we get lawyers to agree to understand that their responsibility oath of office they take is to uphold the Constitution and the rule of law when in fact
every day in front of them they are seeing absolute violations of that in a partisan, political atmosphere and remaining silent.
And as Martin Luther King said at the end of the day, it would not be those the words of our enemies that will be the silence of our friends that brought us down.
And that's my biggest concern. We are well on the way that people and still not engaged in the battle to preserve the core principles of the rule of law.
And I welcome everybody's effort to try to deal with that in a way, but it is remarkable to me.
As a lawyer who's very proud to be a lawyer, how silent my peers have been in facing this very real problem.
And a lot of it is because it's politics, but democracy. Policy is devised through politics. And all of you engaged in that work are, in my view, noble.

@49:10 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you for that eloquent intervention. I was at the National Association of Attorneys General meeting yesterday, and this was not on the agenda indeed.

@49:21 - Scott Harshbarger
Right.

@49:22 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
So I have in the queue next, I have Tina and then Ben. And Jeff and Justin have what I'll call bridging remarks.
They're going to take us into the topic too by speaking to both topics. And I also want to take names for the queue of people who would like to speak about FOIA abuse coming up.

@49:40 - Tina Barton - The Elections Group
So with that, let me go over to Tina Barton as at the elections group. Hi, Beth. Thank you for having me today.
And I think my remarks are probably going to cover both also. But just hearing a lot of the first conversation spoken about really coming from lawyers' perspectives or other groups I spent.
I just finished up a 32 year career in government. So I have spent nearly my whole life subject to FOIA.
And the last 16 years of my career specifically processing FOIA requests, I think that if transparency and chain of custody were the perfect answer, I would agree that those are good things.
I agree that we need more of that in government. I agree we need more of that in elections. I think that that though operates under the assumption that requests are being filed for a place where they're actually seeking truth and they're seeking real information when I think a lot of what we are facing right now are requested aren't really seeking truth.
They're seeking disruption. And so one of the things that I have found is I have traveled the country over the last years, other than my four year passed the outstanding
a lack of the ability to respond, the lack of knowledge on how they should respond, and the lack of training.
And they also feel that they don't have a unified front with other election officials that are getting the same request, that everybody is not responding in the exactly the same way, if you will.
And so there is this disruption within the community of, well, I can get this from this election official, but I can't get the same thing from another election official.
And again, I think that comes from a lack of education and training on the FOIA laws. It also comes from a lack of resources where election officials often don't have an attorney on staff who is specifically trained in FOIA law.
A lot of times they have a general law attorney who covers every single topic in local government, but FOIA is not their specialty.
So they're desperately in need of professionals who specialize in FOIA law to give them direction, give help give them resources when it comes to these types of requests that are voluminous in nature and a lot of them don't understand their ability or don't know that they have the ability to even charge not only someone's salary but someone's salary plus their benefits.
They don't know that they have the right to ask for large deposits in order to cover the cost of that.
They're seeing big impacts to their budgets. They're seeing large impacts to the task that they're able to complete in their office.
And I think that we need to have an education of our legislature as well as our boards and commissions on the local levels of the impact that this is having on local government and county government.
And specifically, I mean these are the sunshine laws, I think that we need to shed some light also on these types of requests that are coming in and the impact that they're having on our resources at a local level.

@53:00 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. Thank you so much. And Tina, there's a question to you in the chat. And I'm going to go over to Ben Berwick.

@53:08 - Ben Berwick - Protect Democracy
Hey, everyone. Nice to be here with you all. So my comments are sort of, in some ways, connected to Tina's.
And I don't want to fight the prompt too much, because I do think that frivolous litigation is a major problem.
I think it will continue. I think it is undermining confidence in our elections. And I think accountability for the lawyers behind it is really critical.
That being said, when this is a session on elections aversion, and when we're talking about elections aversion specifically, that the results will ultimately be overturned and the wrong person will be declared the winner, I think I'm less concerned that truly frivolous litigation is going to lead to that result.
And I think that's sort of what we've seen post 2020 and 2022. What I am a lot more concerned about is litigation that has a kernel of truth to it or some maybe remotely plausible hook.
What I mean by that is election administration, there are people on this call who are far more expert than I am at election administration.
But from what I know, from what I understand, election administration is enormously complex and even in the best of times, they are going to be occasional mistakes and errors made.
And we are far from the best of times right now that election administrators are overwhelmed. They are underfunded. They are under attack.
They are resigning in rows around the country. And the result is I think we're going to see a lot more errors and mistakes and complications and other innocent ones, maybe minor, maybe along the lines of some of the things that we saw in Maricopa County.
county in 2022, although I think those, you know, Maricopa County is actually quite well run in a lot of ways.
And that those are going to provide fodder for litigation that provide an opening for sort of more litigation that may on its face not look entirely frivolous and provide an opening for sympathetic judges who may actually want to do something about the election result.
So I think, you know, when I think about the problem in terms of elections, I think we are focused a lot more on kind of making sure that administrators have the resources they need that people know those positions, that they're experts in those positions that they are funded in the way they need to be to avoid providing kind of a hook for election deniers.

@56:03 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Many thanks. And let me just clarify two things. One is fighting the prompt is fine. To some extent, again, Democracy Fund specifically selected topics where they wanted to do more learning, which is not the exclusion of other areas in which they're already doing work.
Number one, number two, I think hearing about what's worth emphasizing, what's the emphasizing is very helpful. Two, just to speak to a topic that's been raised back channel to me a few times.
Don't worry if your intervention is quote unquote off topic. In Zoom, as I said at the outset, it is very difficult to moderate fully on topic conversation.
In real space and much harder in Zoom, we will sort it all out after the fact. So if you have something meaningful to say, please add it and do not self censor for the feeling that it might be off the immediate topic.
And third thing is that if you do have some immediate intervention or reply to somebody, please feel free to leave.
just to let me know back channel of by using the drop down and writing to me directly in the chat and I will be happy to reorder the queue as needed.
And with that, I think we're going over to Jeff R. Jeff Roberts will begin to take us into our second topic as well.

@57:18 - Jeff Roberts, CFOIC, NFOIC
Hi everybody. Thanks. I agree that transparency and proactive disclosure is really useful for this problem. And we've seen a fair amount of that in Colorado in some counties.
And I hope we see more of that. The main thing I wanted to bring up is what I don't think is the solution and something we're dealing with in Colorado right now, which is legislation to limit what people can request in terms of freedom of information requests from county clerks in a period before election.
elections and a period after elections. And so we have an open records bill in the legislature right now and the clerks have proposed this and we're dealing with that right now and it's just allowing them to blanketly deny requests for any kind of public records.
21 days before an election and for a period after an election. Any kind of record that a county clerk would be the custodian for and that's a lot of kinds of record.
And that's an overreaction in our mind. And so I don't think Colorado is the only state that's dealing with this or has dealt with a proposal like this.
There was a similar proposal in Virginia that I know about and they were able to push back on it.
But I think that there is desperation on the part of clerks and they're coming up with proposals like this and and it's hard to
to push back because we do understand how inundated they've been. In fact, last fall, I got requests for public records from people thinking that I was a records custodian and they were clearly from the MyPillow Army and they were all very similarly worded for communications and things like that.
And I had to explain that nowhere a nonprofit that actually helps people with public records requests were not the custodian of any records.
And I did advise them on how to narrow their requests and things like that because they wanted the world and wanted everything.
And most of them didn't respond back to me. But anyway, I just wanted to bring that up to that there are things being proposed that I think are reaching too far.

@1:00:00 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you very much. I want to also just make sure that we're also hearing here from anybody who may be coming more from the technical side rather than from the legal side.
Since the my pillow army requests are going to get more with chat GPT and the ability of people to use AI to create to duplicate and create content extraordinarily easily.
So I would love to also hear from people with technical expertise here as well. So with that, let me go over to Justin Levitt from LMU Loyola.

@1:00:35 - Justin Levitt
So I'm not going to answer that bill unfortunately with the technical expertise, but one intervention on the last topic and then one per topic to on FOIA.
Just first, I want to plus one the support for the enhanced support for in litigation connections and bar complaints because I think those probably the most targeted and most effective ways.
But if we are brainstorming and expanding. did pool beyond what might be the most targeted and most effective. There were a few things that were raised in the last discussion that I just want to expand on for additional areas of intervention.
Someone mentioned that I apologize, I don't remember whom, that firms don't generally get sanctioned by professional responsibility complaints, but they can lose business.
And there were several efforts in the last cycle of nonsense to educate firms, to educate firms clients about the problematic behavior of some of the attorneys who represented them.
And at least in a few instances, they were extremely effective in the firms sanctioning their own attorneys who had participated in frivolous or malicious litigation.
And so I don't want to lose sight of that opportunity. I think it was Brian who set up top that these lawsuits are designed for a purpose.
And I agree with Tina's note that they care often intended not for true, but for disruption. I don't know that they can be disproven because they're not intended to be proven.
They're offered for other purposes and sometimes not even litigation wins. And so these other two interventions, I think might help to go after those purposes.
First is increasing public understanding about what the legal system does and doesn't do. This is connected, I think, to your second broad topic in the series, not today's topic too, but the second meeting that I think you want to hold.
And that is helping to train journalists and reporters to understand what the filing of law fee does not mean because some of these lawsuits are designed for public reaction rather than reaction in the courts and helping the public understand what is going on is immensely important.
There was some pushback in the most recent round of public litigation, but not enough. The second thing, and Sylvia mentioned this, I think, in the comments in the chat.
is that these lawsuits are designed to raise money or designed to enable people to raise money. And they are raising money ostensibly for lawsuits that isn't actually going to the lawsuits.
So this may speak to Scott's former life. I think there are ample opportunities in very careful, very well researched fraud litigation, both civil fraud complaints by action by government entities to go after fundraising campaigns that are predicated on the existence of litigation that actually are used to raise money to line pockets and to in no way actually pay for any litigation.
There may only be a few instances of that. I don't pretend that that is actually the full water works, but going in a high profile way after some of those instances may help calm down the impulse to use the litigation as a fundraising tool.
Moving to to the second topic and FOIA response. I think that it may be possible to engage with some of the concerns that Jeff raised through construing state FOIA requests.
Most of these Freedom of Information requests, I think, are based on state laws, not based on the federal FOIA.
The State Freedom of Information laws aren't designed, I think, to get at what is effectively a denial of service problem, repeat attacks on the system that use what FOIA makes available in order to stop election service.
And I share the sense of the importance of real Freedom of Information, both processes and statutory structure. And I share Jeff's concerns about an instance, again, the complete shutdown.
But I also think there's a difference between real access to information. and the sort of last minute broly ocean request that is designed to simply shut down the capacity of the local Office to respond.
And my sense is that most state laws don't expressly recognize that difference but could readily be construed by sympathetic state officials like attorney general To channel a reasonable response to reasonable requests while also shutting down repeat chat GPT or just cut and paste Freedom of information request and aren't actually designed for information.
So I think there is a lot of good work to be done in encouraging sympathetic state attorney general to design something that is not a shut down of freedom of information but a construing of existing laws to reject Freedom of information requests that are denial of service or postpone bringing information laws that are denial of service malicious phone

@1:06:00 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Justin, thank you. We'll see if Scott wants to respond at all to you in the chat. And also, again, if there are any two-finger interventions at any point or two thumb interventions, those are also very welcome.

@1:06:12 - Jason R. Baron
So I'm going over now to Jason, I believe, is next. Thank you so much, Beth, for the invitation of the forum.
I was a Justice Department lawyer, handling White House, email litigation, and then the first Director of Litigation at the National Archives before academia.
I appreciate this shout-out to the work at University of Maryland on AI and FOIA, and I could talk to anyone about that.
There are a couple of things I want to say that are sort of modest here, but first, there's a fundamental principle, which is at the federal level, and my experience is at the federal level, but there are parallels to the state, that doesn't matter what the motive of a requester is, doesn't matter who you are.
And so I think we need to respect that as a baseline principle for I'm hearing to the FOIA mission in ESOS.
Also, vexatiousness is in the eye of the beholder. I know a number of public interest groups who I admire greatly who are considered vexatious requesters at the federal level.
And the culture and the ethos of federal agencies need to change with respect to that. But let's stipulate that there are a class, a subset of requesters that are vexatious by all of our standards in terms of overburdening the system and disrupting it.
And so I have a couple of a few practical proposals. They are singles, they are not home runs in the space.
They come from the federal experience, but I think they apply to the state experience. One is that there's a expectation built into the FOIA law and the federal level that if there are three requests that are the same, that they are posted on.
line and there's no need to duplicate that for other requesters. The second is, is that there's a practice at agencies for interim responses that cap the number of pages that an agency is expected to will by practice respond to for 250 pages a month or 500 pages a month to a request that is much much larger and that generally is accepted and adhered to and in fact endorsed by in certain federal court litigation.
Thirdly, there's the batter of fees. One could charge fees for search requests, search and increase the hourly rate of fees.
There's also an issue about the scope of there. There are some agencies in the federal government that take a let's say set a high standard for what constitutional
to a substantial public interest justifying a waiver of fees. I'll also say that there is what I push for at the federal level is greater engagement with requesters.
That is problematic with vexatious requesters, but there may be ways to progress in trying to talk to people early on.
The last thing I'll say is that there's a FOIA advisory committee that some of us have been on, Suzanne at Rutgers, David, Poulier, and it's on the present term with me.
There are 51 recommendations from that FOIA advisory committee. I can put a link up in the chat. Many of which I believe are applicable to this state experience.
So I would urge people to take a look at that sort of set of rich resources when thinking about the problem.
I can say that not all of the recommendations have been complied with by federal agencies, but it's a start.
None of what I've said here addresses specifically. election issues arising, but I do think that they are small steps in a way to address these larger issues.
Thanks very much.

@1:10:11 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
That's fantastic. And Jason, if you would like to add yourself back to the queue to tell us about any of the work that's being done in Maryland, we'd love to hear about that as well as the very tactical and practical suggestions you've given us for agencies.
For the moment, I'm going to pass it over to David Collier from Arizona, and I'll take more names as well in the queue.

@1:10:36 - David Cuillier (Brechner FOI Project, Florida, he/him)
Great. Thanks so much. And thanks for this great gathering, some great comments. And Jason, you just nailed it. That was awesome.
And I'm a former journalist and a journalism professor at the University of Arizona, but I'll be taking a new job in July at the Brechner Freedom of Information Project at the University of Florida.
It focuses on practical research to help us understand the problems and solutions. So the American public can have the information and needs to better self-govern.
That's what we're all here for, right? Um, I applaud the brief that you wrote up. I think it's spot-on on a lot of recommendations investing in technology, proactive requests.
The civic education idea, I love, we need that in the US. Uh, other countries have it. It's required in Mexico.
Why isn't it here? Uh, I also second Suzanne Pietrowski's suggestion regarding alternative resolution models. In addition in New Jersey, I really live close to Pennsylvania and Ohio.
As well as the dozen of nations that have figured out how to unclog the courts with these disputes. So, um, uh, fact, I'll put a link into a white paper we did last year there.
It's in the chat on, on this with a lot of research. So let's put that on this. I also agree with Jeff Roberts that I think we need a lot more research on this vexations request idea before we start promoting specific legislation.
I know that's how a lot of laws get passed in response to some problem children. And that's, I think, what's happening in our country right now.
But we don't have the research to really know the outcome of what could happen. You know, the United Kingdom has tried to deal with this.
I'll put it in the chat. A link to their whole provisions in dealing with vexations requests. We know there are states that have tried to deal with this, Washington State, Wisconsin, Connecticut.
In fact, the National Freedom of Information Coalition did a white paper on this in 2018. I just put a link to that.
It was a great start. But we really do know that. need some more systematic practical research to identify the problems.
Exactly. Let's quantify what's going on. We have a lot of anecdotes and it's serious. It's important. But more important, what model laws work and what ones don't.
I mean, look, we have evidence that some agencies create blacklists and watchlists of requesters formally and informally. We know that.
We know that it's a slippery slope of who's vexatious. I'm sure many government officials thought I was vexatious as a reporter.
So how do we really get at that? We also know agencies often deny requests because of the burden, even when it isn't allowed by law.
And we also know that a lot of agencies use fees, copy fees, and time delays as a way to shunt these sometimes.
request to force them to narrow, to home to perfect. So we kind of know all that, but we really do need to get at this with more research.
And I certainly would welcome being involved with that and anything I could do to help and Breckner, but it's a critical issue and it's only going to get worse a year and a half from now, right?
So I'm glad we're meeting here today and perhaps out of this some good ideas can emerge. So thank you so much for your time.
Appreciate it.

@1:14:40 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you so much. I will say we invited folks from Mexico to join us. They are fighting for their lives there when it comes to elections aversion and their electoral system.
So we are going to be their input. So if there's anybody who's not here who should have been here.
We also welcome that advice in the chat of anybody who is sitting on good ideas that we need to make sure to reach out to.
Okay, let me go back to my cues, girls, girls, girls, girls, and I think Jenny is next, Jenny Flanagan from Trusted Elections Fund.

@1:15:17 - Jenny Flanagan, she/her, TEF
Hi everyone, it's great to see you all many old friends new. This is a great conversation and actually David's last point about the runway between now and 2024 is really what's been on my mind in terms of some of the practical realities and what we're dealing with.
There are a lot of great ideas and solutions here, some of them which will take a longer time. Training the new class of lawyers that come through law schools, it's a huge opportunity and an idea that's not that could have some impact if we can get going in research set at the top of the call and something that Tina brought up.
We have to remember who runs. our elections and who participates in our elections and center them in this short run.
It really sticks with me, like a point that an election official said in the throes of the 22 election, I can either respond to these FOIA requests or I can prepare for the election.
What do you want me to do? Because of the under-resourced realities of our election offices, of the ability to respond to the burdensome requests.
So anyway, just kind of as we're thinking about solutions, I just invite us to center the realities of, you know, people just want to vote in an election and be able to trust the outcome on the day to day.
And the realities of election officials to be able to do that in this environment we're talking about. We as the thinkers and builders of solutions, I really invite like what are the bipartisan alliances where we can have trust in those solutions and maybe come up with a set of principles in this balance.
of priorities or principles that are really coming through in this call to make sure that records requests are affordable and continue to be accessible to all in a free and fair democracy, but that we're holding accountable of those who are abusing the process.
And on that point, I'm curious, particularly around other means of accountability, not just for lawyers, and law firms, some of the great ideas and work that's happening now, but perhaps those who are funding efforts to cause these disruptive strategies.
I think my pillow, Wendell was mentioned, you know, there's money behind some of these actions, and I'm wondering if there are other ways that financial incentive that folks are thinking about in terms of accountability.
One more point that I'll post. So the accountability is one, and the second one, I just looked back at my notes, is that today, FOIA is the thing.
And as soon as we get a handle on that with our AI strategies and whatever means of accountability, next iteration of disruption is going to be before us.
And the trust of elections, but that's sort of our thing where was like kind of like what's coming next and how do we prepare for that.
And that's where I come back to strengthening our alliances and getting to some principles that will guide our responses.
And what is whatever the problem is that we're going to be grappling with because today it's for us tomorrow it's going to be something else.

@1:18:30 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. Okay, I've pasted the cue back in and I want to encourage people we haven't heard from to please please please let us hear from you.
And I'm going to ask you a question about the situation of professionals in a variety of fields we've already heard a few interventions on this topic with regard to law students but please let me know if you want to speak to you.
on that topic, which I'll add to the queue as well. So with that, I'm going to go back to Teresa, and we'll go from there.

@1:19:06 - M. Teresa Mabry
Thank you, and thank you, Jenny. So I'm not going to lie to you all, before 2020, we were in an organization that was considered disruptive when we were requesting records for our jail-based voting program.
And let's not lie, like this is a racialized, like it's not gender, like it's not class. And so I think we're coming up with some of the solutions, and I know Marilyn, you popped in the chat, we had more transparency.
The Arizona had one of the most reputable vote-by-mail systems in the nation for 26 years until 2018. Excuse me, 2022, I'm going back too far.
And so this movement, and this is a distraction, right? This is a disruption, this is a distraction, but the longer term means of power, how are we building power to really make sure that our communities are heard and centered in this way.
And there's a lot of beautiful expertise, and I will be hidden up for me later, but I'm really, really, really, really, really,
wondering how do we leverage the actual, not just the mechanics of FOIA requests, but really talking about how we, what are the means in which we're using legal expertise and our relationships with journalists to talk about issues and the lives that are happening and disrupting us all from what we want.
And so we want to be free and democracy really belongs to the people. How are we actually centering our people?
And I know Scottie were like, where are the young people at? We're here. We're here. We are present. We are doing things.
Part of the issue is that, you know, a lot of us aren't privy to these conversations or these spaces because they are gatekeepers.
And so how are we moving our resources? What are we thinking about courts accountability? Having transparency around making sure our ballots, images are updated so we have expedited results is not the answer.
We do not want that our Secretary of State is lobbying for that. That's not the answer. The answer is or was for us.
The fair elections, ballot initiatives that we hope to pass, but the supreme And so as we're thinking about how the courts have politicized, when we're moving to these efforts, how are we actually using national resources and connected resources like, yes, resourcing in the south around elections and organizing general is, is sparse.
How can we utilize the resources that we have to really think about this issue as a community safety issue.
I know that y'all third topic. Like we funded all year round, we need to talk about these issues. The reason we were so successful and what we didn't think would be leverage that we're preparing for in 2024 in regards to what's happening or what potentially moving in Arizona is that we had a crew of national groups like y'all like attorneys lawyers legal strategist and community organizers come together.
And I think the part of the issue that's missing right now is that we're talking about this week, like we speak in a lot of legalese.
We in this conversation and talking about how we're going to hold folks accountable. but accountability often is punitive and means that certain folks who look a certain way are going to be funneled a disbar from the conversation.
And so how do we make sure that we're not also weaponizing a future that disengages many of us who are looking to build power.

@1:22:20 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Fantastic. Let me keep going in the queue. And again, we have some questions. I hope Jason will be able to speak a little bit to the question in the chat about technical solutions.
We've seen many over the years now beginning to emerge with regard to FOIA and I'm going to start bringing us into topic three as well.
And just a fair warning that we try to do as we move towards the end of this a tour de tobla and ask for a single recommendation for our funding partners here from everybody who's here.
So we're going to volunteer to hold everybody. And so start thinking about what your one 10 second. suggestion is that you would like to share.
Okay, where did I end up next? Jay Wagner, over to you.

@1:23:08 - A.Jay Wagner
Hi, first of all, thanks for convening this, Dr. Novak. This is a very thoughtful panel. Appreciate it. I'm going to echo a lot of what Jeff, Jason, and Dave said in that, just cautioning any changes where we think about limiting voluminous, vexations, frivolous burdens.
However, we want to frame that these are difficult and easy to circumvent. It's very easy to take up what is determined to be of voluminous requests and split it up yourself or split it among other people.
So I think a lot of these, what is existing on the ground right now are easy to circumvent. So I would be very careful in moving forward with what's out there as far as trying to limit requesters without going into what's subjective.
And then we get into what what Teresa discussed where it becomes weaponized against us or what Katie did and Katie's group was hugely important in what we learned in Wisconsin, where I live, about our election.
our election investigations. Thank you very much, Katie. But I think what we really need to think about is not burdening an already-slorotic system, but think about how we can buttress it, how we can continue to build it, and how we lean into technology.
We're starting to talk about eFoya 2.0. I think Margaret Quoke is the first person I would say that, but think about how we embrace technology to provide more information from people rather than building more walls around access to government information.
There's lots of really great research out there. Dr. Novick was early in the game on that, but thinking about how we can get more records to people, Jason mentioned release one to release, or release to one, release to all.
There's a lot of different methods that we can think about where affirmative disclosure or a proactive disclosure can put more information out into the public without burdening custodians.
I thought Susan made a very important point. We need to continue to talk to custodians. These are the people that...
have probably the most understanding of where the system is burdened and where it's problematic and maybe even where solutions may be.
So I thank Susan for remembering custodians because I think we need to talk to them and bring them into the conversation as well.
But again, I would hesitate trying to limit requests and look at methods, particularly technological methods for putting more information out there.
And it sounds like Jason's going to do that right now. Thank you.

@1:25:25 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
A great tee up right there. Jason, back to you.

@1:25:29 - Jason R. Baron
Thanks and my apologies for taking you up for time. But Beth has urged me to say something. So the fact is that we all know that there are tremendously increasing volumes of records.
At the federal level, there are 600 million emails sitting at the National Archives representing three billion pages of emails from Ronald Reagan to Donald Trump that are not accessible because of PII and will not be accessible for 75 years unless we have AI.
high software to deal with that, to make it more accessible. There are well known solved ways to deal with volume and to deal with technology, that is to incorporate technology in the e-discovery lawyer community.
There are lots of ideas. Some have been mentioned in the briefing paper about AI and deep replication. This is an information governance problem where the FOIA people of the world at the federal and state level really don't have their siloed.
They don't have the same resources as some lawyers do in some agencies. And certainly the private sector is 10 years ahead of anybody in government on these topics.
But education training in the future on e-discovery is a step forward. It won't solve election problems in 2024, but it will be a necessary solution when you have 1,000 times the amount of email, electronic message.
and every other form of electronic records that we will have in 2030. On the AI point, I'll just say 30 more seconds.
It's a well-known way, there are well-known ways to search for large volumes of records that could be incorporated in more complex gates as a request.
That's not necessarily what we're talking about here, but in the complex world, there are well-known ways to search using machine learning and predictive coding, technology assistant review.
That's what lawyers know in the space. I would be happy to chat with people about that. There is a harder problem about using AI to segregate out exempt material under federal and state laws.
We have been working on the delivery process privilege and finding ways to use classifiers to separate out factual material and deliberative material.
I'm excited by a really state-of-the-art project thinking about how GPT-4 does the segregation. aggregation and what errors it makes.
So I'll stop there, but I'd be delighted to talk to anyone offline about these matters.

@1:28:07 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. If there's anything you can put in the chat, I don't know if there's any public websites or what not about some of that work.
Jason, we'd love to see those links in the chat. I think I have Susanna next on my list and taking other names.

@1:28:25 - Susannah Goodman
Yeah, I just I'm jumping ahead to solutions of the proactive disclosure piece that was a bullet about proactively disclosing ballot images.
And this is something we're wrestling with at Common Cause because we were a transparency organization before we're a pro democracy organization.
In Colorado, I believe they don't disclose until after certification. And so, you know, I just I don't have a solution, but I want to be part of this.
conversation going forward with all the really smart people in this call because I believe we fully are committed to transparency and I will note that when we talk about auditing elections which is we talk about not auditing from ballot images that the really good audits use the actual voter verified paper ballots.
So there's nothing in principles and best practices for auditing election that goes from digital material like cast vote records and ballot images.
Again apologies I don't have a brilliant solution I believe in disclosure and appropriate guardrails to protect election workers in the public alike.

@1:29:43 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Fantastic let me go over now to JP and again the reminder as we're getting towards the end of our session happy to take interventions on any of the three topics so that we're now really trying to focus the conversation on professional
professional development and professional training. Very happy for anything on any topic as we move forward. More important that we hear from all of you than that we order things in a new way.
Okay, JP over to you. And okay.

@1:30:15 - JP Grillet
Sure, hi, thanks. So I am JP, he has pronouns, democracy, North Carolina. I'm not a lawyer, but I'm learning a great deal from you all and everybody on this call and I really appreciate it.
But I cannot get into the weeds as much on this penny of these issues really. But I am sensing a general theme and I think it's worth acknowledging and something that really has to be interrogated for any law firm.
Going back to several points that people have made about why are law firms not speaking up. I work with a lot of law firms that work on elections law.
And one thing that seems to happen, one thing that law firms seem to care more about than democracy in a lot of cases is money.
funding. And I think that something that really has to be reconciled and wrestled with among lawyers, professional lawyers, both sides because this is a nonpartisan issue is that they value funding and they value money more than democracy so far in my experience working on elections in North Carolina.
When an issue comes up, the main driving question is whether this is a lucrative enough case to get some extra money, extra funding from some national group.
And then when you go back behind those behind the scenes there, you know, who are those funders and what are their main motivations?
And unfortunately, most of their motivations do end up being partisan and they just don't want Trump to win. Otherwise, they don't care.
And so I think, you know, it's really important for that to be a grounding and a level setting in any of these conversations when we're talking about reforms or
Freedom of information what we want to request and what we're actually asking of the folks making those requests So yeah, I again, I don't I can't get into the weeds on this.
I'm not a lawyer, but we do need to be very explicit about the fact that most law firms in the space care more about funding and their funding schedules at the end of the year than they do about actual democracy in the theoretical sense With apologies to Rebecca whom I skipped before can we go back to you now my apologies?

@1:32:33 - Rebecca Green
Sure Thanks for having this convening I've been listening with great interest to many many good ideas that have already surfaced I just want to say to JP that you definitely do not need to be a lawyer to get into the week so I think we have heard from a lot of people who who Agreed and even I wanted to I'm responding to the the last prompt.
I wanted to to highlight a project here at William & Mary that is trying to mobilize law students to work with their state's election administrators to help educate the public about why elections are should be trusted.
And the idea kind of came about in the same way that medical students were on the front lines during COVID.
It felt like there was a role for law students to within their state, the sort of help to provide information to the public on why elections should be trusted.
And while it's kind of a back end solution to the problem of malicious lawsuits and FOIA requests, it does seem like a way to turn the temperature down and help people feel more secure that their elections are well run.
And this a big part of this is sort of explaining what guardrails are in place, statutory and otherwise to ensure.
that ballots are counted correctly. And then I guess another point I'll make is I have been, I have an article coming up as unfortunately not available yet online called adversarial election administration.
And the premise of it is that there's been sort of a fear of the over politicization of election administration.
And it's a pushback on that idea to the extent that involving partisans is actually a way it argues to enhance public trust in elections.
And so I guess I just wanted to inject that idea into this conversation in the sense that while it can be frightening to bring political actors into a conversation, there are arguments for trying to be as inclusive as possible across the political spectrum to ensure that people have by in and feel like they're not standing outside of a smokey room.
So I'll I'll stop there.

@1:35:01 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you going over to Veronica and then to Tom.

@1:35:07 - Veronica Root Martinez, Duke University School of Law
So all I do is spend my time in the weeds, I think, in terms of what we're just do.
And I would just say, you know, I understand that investing in legal education and spending time on educating law students about what their professional obligations are is certainly a long term.
Project, how we got to where we are was also a long term project. It started in the early 80s where we went from conceiving of lawyers as being professionals who were here to serve the public good.
And now, and so when I teach professional responsibility, I start off by framing the class on the dichotomy between the lawyer as a professional versus the lawyer who's running a business.
And what is it that we as lawyers are supposed to be doing and the business. Frederick started in the early 80s, if you're really in the weeds, around the same time as we abandoned stakeholderism in favor of shareholder privacy, but putting that to the side.
And so this was not an overnight thing where we stopped educating lawyers about what it means to be a professional, which is a term of art.
And it's also not something that's going to be fixed overnight. But lawyers are supposed to be gatekeepers of our legal system, of our democracy, of our constitution.
And if we're not investing in those educational components, then it is to be perfectly honest, frankly, very unsurprising to me, that we aren't seeing lawyers act in the way that they should because they weren't educated in that way.
And while I understand that's a long term, not a quick, easy fix, not something that will fix 2024, lawyers will continue to contribute to this problem, if we are not educating them about what their public responsibilities are.

@1:36:57 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
I want to take, put out one last call for now. names to see if anybody wants to chime in and a reminder that in addition to law students, the question also applies equally to other professions.
So computer science students, students studying AI, data science, people studying marketing, other fields that may be relevant here to this conversation that we're having.
That said, let me see who's next.

@1:37:23 - Nashville Food Co-op
I think I'm up to John, is that right? That's right.

@1:37:27 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thanks, Ben. Yes, thanks.

@1:37:30 - Nashville Food Co-op
Hi, my name is John Hovindreich. I'm an partner at Holland at night here in Nashville, Tennessee. I'm also on the board of organized Tennessee, which is an election protection organization here in our state.
And so just wanted to speak to topic three and also topic one a little bit. And particularly with perspective here in the south, Teresa had a great point in the chat, just a second ago here that I want to echo, which is there are not that many opportunities or law students or even.
practicing attorneys here in Tennessee and I think it's similar in other southern states to get involved with election protection work, voting rights work, democracy work, the funding structure, the basic infrastructure here to allow people to get involved and to do that kind of work either on a pro bono basis or as a career really doesn't exist.
And it's going to take a sustained level of commitment funding to states like Tennessee. We've seen results in Georgia and with Carolina, but there are substantial populations in Tennessee, Mississippi, Alabama, Louisiana, across the south that with sustained investment and engagement in election protection, funding positions that young lawyers can see themselves coming to and not have to think necessarily they just have to go to a law firm or whatever the case may be.
I was And I'm not a student come up to me, a little defellorship, are having trouble finding them in the South.
Can't find them in Tennessee. Can't find them in other southern states. And so I think it's a sustained effort to fund those positions.
Oh, and I'm hopefully folks can hear me.

@1:39:29 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
We hear you again. I don't think I don't know if I was you or it was me. You're good.
I'm talking.

@1:39:37 - Nashville Food Co-op
No, I just think the sustained effort to fund those positions and also to engender and support organizations at the law school level.
For example, Vanderbilt Law School has the voting rights and advocacy society that has only been around a couple of years, but those are funneling students into dental careers around voting rights and democracy.
So I think supporting those organizations. and really working with those students and professors at the law schools and then transitioning them into careers into space and funding those is critical.

@1:40:09 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Great, I'm going over to Scott and then I've got Michael T. and Mark F.

@1:40:18 - Scott Harshbarger
Let me just say that this has been fascinating to be here from all of you, particularly law professors talking about this.
And I'm going to really date myself here and I apologize for that. I did come up out of law school in an era of law reform being very active and law firms playing major lead roles as the lawyers committee for civil rights.
Even on the Saturday night massacre for all of you who far may never remember this, but the American Bar Association essentially called out every elected official and reverse action in those cases.
Those days, I have used in many speeches is how I grew up as a young lawyer seeing the law as an active public tool and being led by lawyers in law firms, deans of law schools, heads of bar associations.
That is simply not existing today. With all due respect to those who are trying to make it happen in some places, the models of it is simply want to maybe we'll do some pro bono work that may count for the ABA law journal and that kind of rankings.
But in terms of any meaningful action, whether it's about an insurrection as a laws to a political demonstration on January 6, whether it's about supporting efforts to fail to fund 147 elected officials who didn't certify a presidential election and watch corporations and others abandon their
commitment three or four months later, there simply are no role models. With all due respect, the law professors trying to teach professional responsibility today are heroes, in my view, all of you, because you're running against the tide that everything you teach, if people go into practice, they're simply going to be ignored.
And I don't mean blatantly ignored, just in fact, where do you look for the leadership? And so I hope that people will think about how do you fund the kind of efforts that we're talking about with law school to teach law students other alternatives.
And secondly, how do we incent leaders of law firm? How do we incent deans of law school to be willing to stand up and be counted as opposed to being concerned about losing donations, losing contributions?
I mean, we're in a world where I think it's just very difficult to espouse how professionals, when we basically lost core values of ethics and morality in our society generally, but lawyers have a special obligation in democracy.
And I think, I hope those of us, at least their legal lawyers, will focus on how do we recap, renew, somehow revitalize the concept that the role of a lawyer in a democracy is to protect the Constitution and the rule of law.
Yes, does Ellis advocacy, yes, represent clients, but also to have a broader public interest and role in preserving the constraints that keep us free.
Sorry for the speech, my apologies.

@1:43:44 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Wonderful. No apologies, please. I've got Michael and Mark, and then I want to switch us to a tour de tabla, and that is the place also I want to encourage people to be as self-serving as possible.
If we need to fund something that you're doing, we want to hear about it. So please be concrete and specific and we're going to go around the table.
The first I'm going to go to Michael and then to Mark.

@1:44:08 - Michael Teter (he/him) -- The 65 Project
Thank you. First, I've learned so much in this conversation also would be remiss if I didn't say I've also learned that it's possible to have a huge Zoom conversation that is effective and well done.
So thank you to Beth and Valerie and Condane and everyone else at the Government Lab for putting this together.
I think one voice that's and justices who are responsible for setting not just the standards for how these kind of claims, how these requests for sanctions, bar complaints, but also the norms in their individual legal communities will be addressed.
And so I would have one kind of answer to that third question is would be to invite and make sure we reach out to the Conference of Chief Justices because I think that they are advocating.
kids for a statewide judiciary process that is well regarded and well respected and able to handle the kind of claims that are rising both on the merits and now on the discipline side.
So I just want to encourage that.

@1:45:14 - Scott Harshbarger
Can we get truck. Can we get justice Thomas? That could be part of the next group.

@1:45:20 - Michael Teter (he/him) -- The 65 Project
Parliament says sorry sorry sorry.

@1:45:22 - Scott Harshbarger
Justice that I should be. Thank.

@1:45:26 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
We're not paying enough Scott. Let's go over to.

@1:45:32 - Mark Fenster
Let's go over to Mark. That's a tough act to follow. I was unable to attend the first hour because I was teaching but I teach at the University of Florida law school.
One of the things that has been really interesting to me is an outsider to election law. If that I've been a.
I have been an election protection election watcher for almost as long as I've lived in Florida for 20 years.
And one of the interesting things about it to me. as a sort of administrative act is the extent to which resources are marshaled at particular moments.
That is clearly it's a year round effort, but people are hired and funding is available for Election Day specific and in the aftermath for specific tasks that are engaged in.
And so I wonder if at the state level, both some sort of priority can be given in the aftermath of elections as well as funding can be provided in the lead up to and aftermath of elections to process fear of information acts more quickly at a priority level.
That strikes me is that it would respond both to the need as well as to the legitimacy question of the election administration.

@1:46:48 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Oh, well, thank you. I'm going to now move us to a tour de tabla and per the chat. I'm just going to go around and call on everybody as I see you in my window.
So whether it's short term or it's long term, whether it's C3 or C4, what's the one thing that democracy fund voice should fund?
Or what's the one thing that really needs to happen? So I'll ask you to be brief to give us a chance to hear from everybody.
And I'll just start with Teresa, who I see first on my window.

@1:47:21 - M. Teresa Mabry
That's accountability work. I think we need to bench and we need to figure out what's happening and pull it aside.

@1:47:30 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Great. Hanay, can you hear us?

@1:47:36 - Hani Mirza
Yes. I think more funding like especially in Texas, kind of linked to what I said earlier, funding for finding against bad bills that like enable these bad actors to continue doing what and I think
media funding so that we can make these like local and state issues get more national reach and have more uh eyes and ears focused on these issues that are undermining our democracy.

@1:48:15 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Awesome. Marilyn Marks. You're muted.

@1:48:24 - Marilyn Marks, Coalition for Good Governance
Sorry, I'm a member. Thank you. I would say funding for litigation on three frocks, one election transparency, two election security, meaning the voting system security.
All the funding has abandoned uh just has gone away from that area, but also funding for fighting against elections of version.
Everybody's heard of the Georgia law that was put in a couple of years ago where the state election board can put in a partisan to replace an entire bipartisan board.
We're the only, we're tiny little organization, the only organization litigating that issue of essentially a state invoked partisan to be put over in place of bipartisan boards.
So those three areas of litigation, funding to support election transparency and good fair open elections, that's what I would say.

@1:49:26 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you.

@1:49:31 - David Cuillier (Brechner FOI Project, Florida, he/him)
Oh, thank you. Yeah, I'd like to see immediate actionable, practical, strategic research that quantifies the issue and figures out what actually can help solve the problem.
And then the next step is getting that those changes into the state legislatures across the country. However, we do that, but I think that's a huge.
The app out there and it needs to be filled.

@1:50:03 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. Over to Suzanne Ruckers.

@1:50:07 - Suzanne Piotrowski
Hi, great. Thank you. I'm going to speak to the third question for my, for my suggestion. And I think we need to talk more, listening, everyone is fastening on educating people on this and not just lawyers, but students of public affairs.
And there's, you said be self-serving Beth. So I'm going with that. We have a small working group on teaching transparency that some folks on the call are off on that's interdisciplinary.
We have journalists. We have law professors, political scientists, public affairs, multidisciplinary and international. So I would go there.

@1:50:50 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. Self-serving fine brief is better. Cindy, I want to hear from everybody.

@1:50:58 - Cindy Cohn (she)
And meeting. I mean, I think that the call for sustained resources for everyone in the community of people who are trying to to to do this work outside is pretty loud and clear.
I, I, and I think that, you know, that's where I live. So I think there are plenty of opportunities, especially for C3 funding around that.
I think that continuing to find ways to support election officials and help them be more transparent in what they do.
Could also be very helpful. As I've noted, I don't know that the FOIA incentives are aligned right now with more transparency for a lot of the people in those departments and thinking about how you could align their incentives towards towards more transparency to me.
And the first instance is one of the ways that you can maybe start nipping this in the bud. But, you know, I just, I really want to caution that people, the many of the things that these agencies are suffering under are not based on
Good faith. And so I think we run the risk of plugging today's toll, but the people who are interested in coming up the works are going to find tomorrow's whole and we should think about more broadly rather than just kind of playing whack a mole with whatever.
Easy thing they picked up first to try to come up the works because I do think that some of the animating stuff is really a hostility to functioning elections entirely and not about particular things.

@1:52:28 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Great 30 seconds or less please.

@1:52:31 - Joyce Gist Lewis, Krevolin & Horst
Thanks very much for this conversation today. I was going to say that I think what we really need to do is begin aggressively enlisting bar organizations like the ABA like the National Association of Bar Council, which is coalition of bar council from all over the country, people who work in the state bars.
We really need to get involved in educating them about what is. happening and about the ethical obligations that are being breached.
We need to disrupt this narrative that we've heard a lot about in this call. Anytime you split your toe in this water, you are stepping into political waters.
This is not about politics. This is about the oath that we as lawyers have taken. People are using that to, they're using that oath that we have taken to disrupt the legal system.
And it's, you know, one concrete idea, 10 seconds, Katie.

@1:53:31 - Katie Anthony (she/her), American Oversight
I think putting in the plug for the resources for training and infrastructure to effectively respond to requests and education on the fact that freedom of information is an essential service, not just ancillary to the other work of government officials.

@1:53:50 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Ben, Berwick.

@1:53:52 - Ben Berwick - Protect Democracy
I'll always put funding for election officials on my left, but one thing I will say here is this is a giant, one giant graff
Ultimately, and I think we understand the contours of it to some extent, but not fully. And I think good deep research like Oppo style research into who's funding it where it's coming from is important.

@1:54:13 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Tina. So quickly, I'm going to say resources and funding.

@1:54:21 - Tina Barton - The Elections Group
I'm a former EO. So those are always going to be my answers to everything. They need equipment. They need software.
They need personnel and they need education because EOs are always under resourced and understaffed.

@1:54:33 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Justin 10 seconds.

@1:54:36 - Justin Levitt
I also will never neglect funding for election officials. So you got three in a row beyond that law schools for journalists educating journalists on how to better communicate about all of these issues to the public.

@1:54:47 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
I'll drop a note in the chat on one such resource. Michael and then John H.

@1:54:53 - Michael Teter (he/him) -- The 65 Project
Orgin a organization focused on norm setting in the legal communities have taken away from their arsenal. using the course as well.

@1:55:01 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
John and then Jeff.

@1:55:04 - Nashville Food Co-op
I think you should fund organizations in the south that are doing legal work and I'll put in a plug for organized Tennessee because we're trying to build a legal arm this year.
So welcome on any and all funding. Thanks.

@1:55:18 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Jeff and then Adam.

@1:55:21 - Jeff Roberts, CFOIC, NFOIC
Yeah, I would say research resources for to promote more transparency and proactive disclosures by elected officials and like David's idea about actual research as well.

@1:55:35 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Adam over to you and then I've got Jay.

@1:55:40 - Adam M. Sparks (Krevolin & Horst)
I propose funding legal disciplinary authorities, state courts, bar associations. The CCJ was a good idea so that they have the time, attention and labor to refine those accountability tools, sanctions, contempt, what have you and to educate their members about how to wield them and how to get their faith to live against some of their counsel.

@1:55:59 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Jay and then Rebecca.

@1:56:00 - A.Jay Wagner
No more prohibitive. No more prohibitive. F O I provisions, grow affirmative disclosure, and then learn to identify, anticipate popular records.

@1:56:10 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Rebecca and then Jason Barron.

@1:56:13 - Rebecca Green
Just a point of information that the conference of chief justices has gotten involved in this state, this space through the election law program, which I co-direct is a joint project of the National Center for State Corps is in William and Mary law school.

@1:56:27 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you, Jason and then Mark. Oh, we may have lost Jason. I'm going to go to Mark.

@1:56:37 - Mark Fenster
Me mark.

@1:56:39 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Yes, your mark. Funding research for best practices for for election officials responding to have what I request. Susanna and then Scott.

@1:56:53 - Susannah Goodman
I would say obviously work to promote funding of election officials and. To the extent that litigation and FOIA are tools of a campaign to undermine confidence in elections, I would say inoculation, funding counter-narratives to how the election processes works and promote transparency.

@1:57:15 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Scott, and then is there anybody, some of you are not on video, is there anybody I haven't called on that I need to call on?
Veronica, I see you. So JP, Veronica, and Scott.

@1:57:30 - Scott Harshbarger
Am I on that?

@1:57:33 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
No, okay. Yeah, you're on 10 seconds.

@1:57:35 - Scott Harshbarger
10 seconds. Everybody should read the talk bill and go back to citizen engagement at the grassroots level. Democracy is not a spectator sport.
People don't understand what's at risk here. We have a major problem and we're discussing working around details when the reality is most Americans do not think we have a crisis in our democracy that we agree with and that's what second level is.
Give money to one dollar. No, you don't get a second. You don't get a second. One dollar association to do an accountability project.

@1:58:07 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
OK, yay. JP and then Veronica.

@1:58:10 - JP Grillet
In North Carolina, a Democrat to switch to being a Republican, which means we're almost certainly going to have voter ID by the 2024 election.
And for that reason, I want funding for grassroots organizations who are going to help people actually get their voter IDs before any of that ends up in court.

@1:58:28 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Veronica, 10 seconds.

@1:58:30 - Veronica Root Martinez, Duke University School of Law
I would encourage funding and down chairs and ethics and professional responsibility at the top 14 law schools. They're in particular because those schools tend to not value these research topics.
And there are plenty of PR professors who are doing good work, but they're not, anyway, being heard because of elitism within the legal profession.

@1:58:52 - Beth Noveck (she/her)
Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you for being so generous with your expertise and your suggestions. We will put all the logistical follow-ups in an email, including connecting you to one another, sharing notes, and requesting additional resources for you.
Thank you to Democracy Fund and Democracy Fund Voice for putting this on today, and a very, very big thanks to Dane for all the hard work in organizing and also to my colleagues Ken Church at the Institute for Experiential AI to Valeria and to everybody else.
And I'm forgetting, thank you for your time and expertise and help today with putting this session on. And we look forward to following up with you by email, and there will be a second conversation about the role of media.
And if you would like to come to that, or know people who should, we will also ask you that in a follow-up email.
My apologies for keeping you one minute over, more by email and Bon Appetit to everybody. Thank you.

@1:59:48 - Joyce Gist Lewis, Krevolin & Horst
Bye, thanks so much. Recording stopped.
